Utah statutes.
73-18-7.2.   Falsified registration or certificate of title.

It is a third degree felony for any person to:

(1)  alter with fraudulent intent any motorboat or sailboat certificate of title, registration card, or registration decal or outboard motor certificate of title issued by the division or its authorized agent;

(2)  forge or counterfeit any motorboat or sailboat certificate of title, registration card, or registration decal or outboard motor certificate of title purporting to have been issued by the division or its authorized agent;

(3)  alter, falsify, or forge any assignment upon a motorboat, sailboat, or outboard motor certificate of title; or

(4)  hold or use any motorboat or sailboat certificate of title, registration card, or registration decal or outboard motor certificate of title knowing it has been altered, forged, or falsified.

